North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35. Sterilization Procedures.
Article 1A. Guardianship of Incompetent Adults. [Repealed]

§§ 35-1.6 through 35-1.41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 550, s. 7.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1987, c. 783, s. 2, effective August 12, 1987, inserted “without further proceedings” in subdivision (4) of former G.S. 35-1.7 as it read prior to repeal by Session Laws 1987, c. 550, s. 7. The amendment was incorporated into new Chapter 35A, which was added by Session Laws 1987, c. 550, s. 1.